Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 64.
[REPEALED.]

§ 1. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 64, § 1, concerning municipal court jurisdiction, was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 80, § 22(E), effective January 1, 2005.

The amendment was proposed by H.J.R. No. 6 (see Acts 1985, p. 2670) and filed in the office of the Secretary of State on Apr. 16, 1985. It was adopted at the general election on Nov. 4, 1986, by a vote of 361,115 for and 230,187 against.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 64, § 2: effective July 1, 1987, and applicable to all causes of action arising after Nov. 1, 1986.